Maine, session 132, LD652.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is further amended by amending subparagraph (11), division (b) to read:
(b) Housing programs and services to assist those who are experiencing
homelessness in the municipality or plantation as defined in the municipality's
or plantation's development program; and
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is further amended by amending subparagraph (12) to read:
(12) Up to 50% of the capital costs related to the construction or renovation of a
municipality's or plantation's central administrative office, the need for which is
related to general economic development within the municipality or plantation, not
to exceed 15% of the captured assessed value of the development district; and
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is amended by enacting a new subparagraph (13) to read:
(13) Costs associated with establishing and funding a flood assistance program
within a development district that provides financial support for flood insurance
costs for a business or development, including administrative costs, as long as:
(a) The municipality or plantation does not allocate more than 25% of the
annual tax increment to the program; and
(b) Eligibility for the program is limited to a business or development that
meets specific criteria established by the municipality or plantation, including,
but not limited to, being located within a floodplain as designated by the United
States Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management
Agency or other relevant emergency management authority and demonstrating
financial need for assistance;